zh-TW: 吊帶褲款式: X 型背帶; Y 型背帶; 其他
ko: 서스펜더 스타일: X백 서스펜더; Y백 서스펜더; 기타
de: Hosenträger-Stil: Hosenträger X-Form; Hosenträger Y-Form; Sonstiges
cs: Styl šlí: Šle se zády X; Šle se zády Y; Jiné
sv: Stil på hängslen: Hängslen med X-rygg; Hängslen med Y-rygg; Övrigt
pt-BR: Estilo do suspensor: Suspensório em X; Suspensório em Y; Outro
bg-BG: Стил на тиранти: Х-образна подпора; Y-образна подпора; Други
hu: Nadrágtartó stílusa: X-hátú nadrágtartó; Y-hátú nadrágtartó; Egyéb
nl: Stijl jarretel: X-jarretel; Y-jarretel; Andere
zh-CN: 吊带款式: X 型背带; Y 型背带; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul bretelelor: Bretele în formă de X; Bretele în formă de Y; Altele
th: สไตล์ของสายเอี๊ยม: สายเอี๊ยมรูปตัว X ที่ด้านหลัง; สายเอี๊ยมรูปตัว Y ที่ด้านหลัง; อื่นๆ
el: Στυλ για τιράντες: X-back τιράντες; Υ-πλάτη ανάρτηση; Άλλο
sl-SI: Stil naramnic: Naramnice tipa X; Naramnice tipa Y; Drugo
sk-SK: Podväzkový štýl: Traky v tvare X; Traky v tvare Y; Iné
vi: Kiểu dây đeo: Dây đai quần chữ X; Dây đai quần chữ Y; Khác
nb: Bukseselestil: X-rygg-seler; Y-rygg-seler; Annet
it: Stile della bretella: Bretelle a X sulla schiena; Bretella a Y sulla schiena; Altro
lt-LT: Petnešų stilius: X formos petnešos; y formos petnešos; Kita
pt-PT: Estilo de suspensório: Suspensórios cruzados; Suspensórios em Y; Outro
ru: Вид подтяжек: Подтяжки с X-образной спинкой; Подтяжки с Y-образной спинкой; Другое
tr: Askı stili: Çapraz askı; Y şeklinde askı; Diğer
es: Estilo de tirantes: Tirante en X; Tirante en Y; Otros
pl: Styl podwiązek: Szelki X; Szelki Y; Inne
ja: サスペンダースタイル: Xバックサスペンダー; Yバックサスペンダー; その他
da: Suspenderstil: X-ryg-seler; Y-ryg-seler; Andet
fr: Style de bretelles: Porte-jarretelles en X au dos; Porte-jarretelles en Y au dos; Autre
fi: Henkselien tyyli: X-malliset henkselit; Y-malliset henkselit; Muu
hr-HR: Model tregera: Tregeri s X-leđima; Tregeri s Y-leđima; Ostalo
en: Suspender style: X-back suspender; Y-back suspender; Other